Mississippi, session 2026, SB3393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Vedo Kyles of Yazoo County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his convictions of the crimes of possession of stolen goods and attempted armed robbery in 1995 in Yazoo County, Mississippi, and who was sentenced to serve three (3) years with two (2) years suspended for each of two (2) counts of possession of stolen goods, and ten (10) years for attempted armed robbery in the custody of the Department of Corrections, all sentences to run concurrently. He was released to parole on September 16, 1997, and discharged on February 13, 2000. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.